New York, session 2025-2026, S3378.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 330.20 of the criminal procedure law, as added by 2 chapter 548 of the laws of 1980, paragraphs (a) and (b) of subdivision 1 3 as amended by chapter 672 of the laws of 2019, paragraph (d) of subdivi- 4 sion 1 and the opening paragraph of subdivision 2 as amended by chapter 5 479 of the laws of 2022, paragraph (o) of subdivision 1, the closing 6 paragraph of subdivision 2 and subdivisions 7-a and 22 as amended by 7 chapter 107 of the laws of 2004, subdivisions 2 and 20 as amended by 8 chapter 693 of the laws of 1989, subdivision 2-a as added by chapter 1 9 of the laws of 2013, subdivisions 5, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13 and 14 as 10 amended by chapter 789 of the laws of 1985, subdivision 21 as added by 11 chapter 976 of the laws of 1983, and subparagraph (ii) of paragraph (a) 12 of subdivision 21 as amended by chapter 330 of the laws of 1993, is 13 amended to read as follows: 14 § 330.20 Procedure following verdict or plea of not responsible by 15 reason of mental disease or defect. 16 1. Definition of terms. As used in this section, the following terms 17 shall have the following meanings: 18 (a) "Commissioner" means the [state] commissioner of mental health or 19 the [state] commissioner of the office for people with developmental 20 disabilities. 21 (b) "Secure facility" means a facility within the [state] office of 22 mental health or the [state] office for people with developmental disa- 23 bilities which is staffed with personnel adequately trained in security EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03632-01-5 S. 3378 2 1 methods and is so equipped as to minimize the risk or danger of escapes, 2 and which has been so specifically designated by the commissioner. 3 (c) "Dangerous mental disorder" means: (i) that a defendant currently 4 suffers from a "mental illness" as that term is defined in subdivision 5 twenty of section 1.03 of the mental hygiene law, and (ii) that because 6 of such condition [he] the defendant currently constitutes a physical 7 danger to [himself] themself or others. 8 (d) "Mentally ill" means that a defendant currently suffers from a 9 mental illness for which care and treatment as a patient, in the in-pa- 10 tient services of a psychiatric center under the jurisdiction of the 11 [state] office of mental health, is essential to such defendant's 12 welfare and that [his or her] such defendant's judgment is so impaired 13 that [he] the defendant is unable to understand the need for such care 14 and treatment; and, where a defendant has a developmental disability, 15 the term "mentally ill" shall also mean, for purposes of this section, 16 that the defendant is in need of care and treatment as a resident in the 17 in-patient services of a developmental center or other residential 18 facility for individuals with developmental disabilities under the 19 jurisdiction of the [state] office for people with developmental disa- 20 bilities. 21 (e) "Examination order" means an order directed to the commissioner 22 requiring that a defendant submit to a psychiatric examination to deter- 23 mine whether the defendant has a dangerous mental disorder, or if [he] 24 the defendant does not have a dangerous mental disorder, whether [he] 25 the defendant is mentally ill. 26 (f) "Commitment order" [or "recommitment order"] means an order 27 committing a defendant to the custody of the commissioner for confine- 28 ment in a secure facility for care and treatment [for six months from 29 the date of the order]. 30 (g) "First retention order" means an order which is effective at the 31 expiration of the period prescribed in a commitment order [for] or a 32 recommitment order, authorizing continued custody of a defendant by the 33 commissioner for a period not to exceed one year. 34 (h) "Second retention order" means an order which is effective at the 35 expiration of the period prescribed in a first retention order, author- 36 izing continued custody of a defendant by the commissioner for a period 37 not to exceed two years. 38 (i) "Subsequent retention order" means an order which is effective at 39 the expiration of the period prescribed in a second retention order or a 40 prior subsequent retention order authorizing continued custody of a 41 defendant by the commissioner for a period not to exceed two years. 42 (j) "Retention order" means a first retention order, a second 43 retention order or a subsequent retention order. 44 (k) "Furlough order" means an order directing the commissioner to 45 allow a defendant in confinement pursuant to a commitment order, recom- 46 mitment order or retention order to temporarily leave the facility for a 47 period not exceeding fourteen days, [either] with [or without] the 48 constant supervision of one or more employees of the facility. 49 (l) "Transfer order" means an order directing the commissioner to 50 transfer a defendant from a secure facility to a non-secure facility 51 under the jurisdiction of the commissioner or to any non-secure facility 52 designated by the commissioner. 53 (m) "Release order" means an order directing the commissioner to 54 terminate a defendant's in-patient status without terminating the 55 commissioner's responsibility for the defendant. S. 3378 3 1 (n) "Discharge order" means an order terminating an order of condi- 2 tions or unconditionally discharging a defendant from supervision under 3 the provisions of this section. 4 (o) "Order of conditions" means an order directing a defendant to 5 comply with this prescribed treatment plan, or any other condition which 6 the court determines to be reasonably necessary or appropriate, and, in 7 addition, where a defendant is in custody of the commissioner, not to 8 leave the facility without authorization. In addition to such condi- 9 tions, when determined to be reasonably necessary or appropriate, an 10 order of conditions may be accompanied by a special order of conditions 11 set forth in a separate document requiring that the defendant: (i) stay 12 away from the home, school, business or place of employment of the 13 victim or victims, or of any witness designated by the court, of such 14 offense; or (ii) refrain from harassing, intimidating, threatening or 15 otherwise interfering with the victim or victims of the offense and such 16 members of the family or household of such victim or victims as shall be 17 specifically named by the court in such special order. An order of 18 conditions or special order of conditions shall be valid for five years 19 from the date of its issuance, except that, for good cause shown, the 20 court may extend the period for an additional five years. 21 (p) "District attorney" means the office which prosecuted the criminal 22 action resulting in the verdict or plea of not responsible by reason of 23 mental disease or defect. 24 (q) "Qualified psychiatrist" means a physician who (i) is a diplomate 25 of the American board of psychiatry and neurology or is eligible to be 26 certified by that board; or (ii) is certified by the American osteopath- 27 ic board of neurology and psychiatry or is eligible to be certified by 28 that board. 29 (r) "Licensed psychologist" means a person who is registered as a 30 psychologist under article one hundred fifty-three of the education law. 31 (s) "Psychiatric examiner" means a qualified psychiatrist or a 32 licensed psychologist who has been designated by the commissioner to 33 examine a defendant pursuant to this section, and such designee need not 34 be an employee of the department of mental hygiene. 35 2. [Examination] Sentence; examination order; psychiatric examiners. 36 Upon entry of a verdict of not responsible by reason of mental disease 37 or defect, or upon the acceptance of a plea of not responsible by reason 38 of mental disease or defect, the court must immediately (a) impose a 39 period of confinement in the custody of the commissioner which is equal 40 to the sentence of imprisonment such defendant would have received 41 pursuant to article seventy of the penal law, upon conviction of the 42 crime with which the defendant was charged; and (b) issue an examination 43 order. Upon receipt of such order, the commissioner must designate two 44 qualified psychiatric examiners to conduct the examination to examine 45 the defendant. In conducting their examination, the psychiatric examin- 46 ers may employ any method which is accepted by the medical profession 47 for the examination of persons alleged to be suffering from a dangerous 48 mental disorder or to be mentally ill or having a developmental disabil- 49 ity. The court may authorize a psychiatrist or psychologist retained by 50 a defendant to be present at such examination. The clerk of the court 51 must promptly forward a copy of the examination order to the mental 52 hygiene legal service and such service may thereafter participate in all 53 subsequent proceedings under this section. 54 In all subsequent proceedings under this section, [prior to the issu- 55 ance of a special order of conditions,] the court shall consider whether 56 any order of protection had been issued prior to a verdict of not S. 3378 4 1 responsible by reason of mental disease or defect in the case, or prior 2 to the acceptance of a plea of not responsible by reason of mental 3 disease or defect in the case. 4 2-a. Firearm, rifle or shotgun surrender order. Upon entry of a 5 verdict of not responsible by reason of mental disease or defect, or 6 upon the acceptance of a plea of not responsible by reason of mental 7 disease or defect, or upon a finding that the defendant is an incapaci- 8 tated person pursuant to article seven hundred thirty of this chapter, 9 the court shall revoke the defendant's firearm license, if any, inquire 10 of the defendant as to the existence and location of any firearm, rifle 11 or shotgun owned or possessed by such defendant and direct the surrender 12 of such firearm, rifle or shotgun pursuant to subparagraph (f) of para- 13 graph one of subdivision a of section 265.20 and subdivision six of 14 section 400.05 of the penal law. 15 3. Examination order; place of examination. Upon issuing an examina- 16 tion order, the court must, except as otherwise provided in this subdi- 17 vision, direct that the defendant be committed to a secure facility 18 designated by the commissioner as the place for such psychiatric exam- 19 ination. The sheriff must hold the defendant in custody pending such 20 designation by the commissioner, and when notified of the designation, 21 the sheriff must promptly deliver the defendant to such secure facility. 22 [When the defendant is not in custody at the time of such verdict or 23 plea, because he was previously released on bail or on his own recogni- 24 zance, the court, in its discretion, may direct that such examination be 25 conducted on an out-patient basis, and at such time and place as the 26 commissioner shall designate. If, however, the commissioner informs the 27 court that confinement of the defendant is necessary for an effective 28 examination, the court must direct that the defendant be confined in a 29 facility designated by the commissioner until the examination is 30 completed.] 31 4. Examination order, duration. Confinement in a secure facility 32 pursuant to an examination order shall be for a period not exceeding 33 thirty days, except that, upon application of the commissioner, the 34 court may authorize confinement for an additional period not exceeding 35 thirty days when a longer period is necessary to complete the examina- 36 tion. [If the initial hearing required by subdivision six of this 37 section has not commenced prior to the termination of such examination 38 period, the commissioner shall retain custody of the defendant in such 39 secure facility until custody is transferred to the sheriff in the 40 manner prescribed in subdivision six of this section.] During the period 41 of such confinement, the physician in charge of the facility may admin- 42 ister or cause to be administered to the defendant such emergency 43 psychiatric, medical or other therapeutic treatment as in [his] such 44 physician's judgment should be administered. [If the court has directed 45 that the examination be conducted on an out-patient basis, the examina- 46 tion shall be completed within thirty days after the defendant has first 47 reported to the place designated by the commissioner, except that, upon 48 application of the commissioner, the court may extend such period for a 49 reasonable time if a longer period is necessary to complete the examina- 50 tion.] 51 5. Examination order; reports. After [he] a psychiatric examiner has 52 completed [his] an examination of the defendant, each psychiatric exam- 53 iner must promptly prepare a report of [his] such examiner's findings 54 and evaluation concerning the defendant's mental condition, and submit 55 such report to the commissioner. If the psychiatric examiners differ in 56 their opinion as to whether the defendant is mentally ill or is suffer- S. 3378 5 1 ing from a dangerous mental disorder, the commissioner must designate 2 another psychiatric examiner to examine the defendant. Upon receipt of 3 the examination reports, the commissioner must submit them to the court 4 that issued the examination order. If the court is not satisfied with 5 the findings of these psychiatric examiners, the court may designate one 6 or more additional psychiatric examiners pursuant to subdivision 7 [fifteen] fourteen of this section. [The court must furnish a copy of 8 the reports to the district attorney, counsel for the defendant and the 9 mental hygiene legal service.] 10 6. [Initial hearing; commitment] Commitment order. After the examina- 11 tion reports are submitted, the court must[, within ten days of the 12 receipt of such reports, conduct an initial hearing to determine the 13 defendant's present mental condition. If the defendant is in the custody 14 of the commissioner pursuant to an examination order, the court must 15 direct the sheriff to obtain custody of the defendant from the commis- 16 sioner and to confine the defendant pending further order of the court, 17 except that the court may direct the sheriff to confine the defendant in 18 an institution located near the place where the court sits if that 19 institution has been designated by the commissioner as suitable for the 20 temporary and secure detention of mentally disabled persons. At such 21 initial hearing, the district attorney must establish to the satisfac- 22 tion of the court that the defendant has a dangerous mental disorder or 23 is mentally ill. If the court finds that the defendant has a dangerous 24 mental disorder, it must] issue a commitment order for the term of the 25 period of confinement imposed, pursuant to paragraph (a) of subdivision 26 two of this section, and to such a secure facility as shall be suitable 27 for a mentally ill person or a person with a dangerous mental disorder, 28 as the case may be, based upon the examination reports. [If the court 29 finds that the defendant does not have a dangerous mental disorder but 30 is mentally ill, the provisions of subdivision seven of this section 31 shall apply.] 32 7. [Initial hearing civil commitment and order of conditions. If, at 33 the conclusion of the initial hearing conducted pursuant to subdivision 34 six of this section, the court finds that the defendant is mentally ill 35 but does not have a dangerous mental disorder, the provisions of arti- 36 cles nine or fifteen of the mental hygiene law shall apply at that stage 37 of the proceedings and at all subsequent proceedings. Having found that 38 the defendant is mentally ill, the court must issue an order of condi- 39 tions and an order committing the defendant to the custody of the 40 commissioner. The latter order shall be deemed an order made pursuant to 41 the mental hygiene law and not pursuant to this section, and further 42 retention, conditional release or discharge of such defendant shall be 43 in accordance with the provisions of the mental hygiene law. If, at the 44 conclusion of the initial hearing, the court finds that the defendant 45 does not have a dangerous mental disorder and is not mentally ill, the 46 court must discharge the defendant either unconditionally or subject to 47 an order of conditions. 48 7-a. Whenever the court issues a special order of conditions pursuant 49 to this section, the commissioner shall make reasonable efforts to noti- 50 fy the victim or victims or the designated witness or witnesses that a 51 special order of conditions containing such provisions has been issued, 52 unless such victim or witness has requested that such notice should not 53 be provided. 54 8.] First retention order. When a defendant is in the custody of the 55 commissioner pursuant to a commitment order, the commissioner must, at 56 least thirty days prior to the expiration of the period prescribed in S. 3378 6 1 the order, apply to the court that issued the order, or to a superior 2 court in the county where the secure facility is located, for a first 3 retention order or a release order. The commissioner must give written 4 notice of the application to the district attorney, the defendant, coun- 5 sel for the defendant, and the mental hygiene legal service. Upon 6 receipt of such application, the court may, on its own motion, conduct a 7 hearing to determine whether the defendant has a dangerous mental disor- 8 der, and it must conduct such hearing if a demand therefor is made by 9 the district attorney, the defendant, counsel for the defendant, or the 10 mental hygiene legal service within ten days from the date that notice 11 of the application was given to them. If such a hearing is held on an 12 application for retention, the commissioner must establish to the satis- 13 faction of the court that the defendant has a dangerous mental disorder 14 or is mentally ill. The district attorney shall be entitled to appear 15 and present evidence at such hearing. If such a hearing is held on an 16 application for release, the district attorney must establish to the 17 satisfaction of the court that the defendant has a dangerous mental 18 disorder or is mentally ill. If the court finds that the defendant has a 19 dangerous mental disorder it must issue a first retention order. If the 20 court finds that the defendant is mentally ill but does not have a 21 dangerous mental disorder, it must issue a first retention order and, 22 pursuant to subdivision [eleven] ten of this section, a transfer order 23 and an order of conditions. If the court finds that the defendant does 24 not have a dangerous mental disorder and is not mentally ill, it must 25 issue a release order and an order of conditions pursuant to subdivision 26 [twelve] eleven of this section. 27 [9.] 8. Second and subsequent retention orders. When a defendant is in 28 the custody of the commissioner pursuant to a first retention order, the 29 commissioner must, at least thirty days prior to the expiration of the 30 period prescribed in the order, apply to the court that issued the 31 order, or to a superior court in the county where the facility is 32 located, for a second retention order or a release order. The commis- 33 sioner must give written notice of the application to the district 34 attorney, the defendant, counsel for the defendant, and the mental 35 hygiene legal service. Upon receipt of such application, the court may, 36 on its own motion, conduct a hearing to determine whether the defendant 37 has a dangerous mental disorder, and it must conduct such hearing if a 38 demand therefor is made by the district attorney, the defendant, counsel 39 for the defendant, or the mental hygiene legal service within ten days 40 from the date that notice of the application was given to them. If such 41 a hearing is held on an application for retention, the commissioner must 42 establish to the satisfaction of the court that the defendant has a 43 dangerous mental disorder or is mentally ill. The district attorney 44 shall be entitled to appear and present evidence at such hearing. If 45 such a hearing is held on an application for release, the district 46 attorney must establish to the satisfaction of the court that the 47 defendant has a dangerous mental disorder or is mentally ill. If the 48 court finds that the defendant has a dangerous mental disorder it must 49 issue a second retention order. If the court finds that the defendant is 50 mentally ill but does not have a dangerous mental disorder, it must 51 issue a second retention order and, pursuant to subdivision [eleven] ten 52 of this section, a transfer order and an order of conditions. If the 53 court finds that the defendant does not have a dangerous mental disorder 54 and is not mentally ill, it must issue a release order and an order of 55 conditions pursuant to subdivision [twelve] eleven of this section. When 56 a defendant is in the custody of the commissioner prior to the expira- S. 3378 7 1 tion of the period prescribed in a second retention order, the proce- 2 dures set forth in this subdivision for the issuance of a second 3 retention order shall govern the application for and the issuance of any 4 subsequent retention order. 5 [10.] 9. Furlough order. The commissioner may apply for a furlough 6 order, pursuant to this subdivision, when a defendant is in [his] the 7 commissioner's custody pursuant to a [commitment order,] recommitment 8 order[,] or retention order and the commissioner is of the view that, 9 consistent with the public safety and welfare of the community and the 10 defendant, the clinical condition of the defendant warrants a granting 11 of the privileges authorized by a furlough order. The application for a 12 furlough order may be made to the court that issued the commitment 13 order, or to a superior court in the county where the secure facility is 14 located. The commissioner must give ten days written notice to the 15 district attorney, the defendant, counsel for the defendant, and the 16 mental hygiene legal service. Upon receipt of such application, the 17 court may, on its own motion, conduct a hearing to determine whether the 18 application should be granted, and must conduct such hearing if a demand 19 therefor is made by the district attorney. If the court finds that the 20 issuance of a furlough order is consistent with the public safety and 21 welfare of the community and the defendant, and that the clinical condi- 22 tion of the defendant warrants a granting of the privileges authorized 23 by a furlough order, the court must grant the application and issue a 24 furlough order containing any terms and conditions that the court deems 25 necessary or appropriate. If the defendant fails to return to the secure 26 facility at the time specified in the furlough order, then, for purposes 27 of subdivision [nineteen] eighteen of this section, [he] the defendant 28 shall be deemed to have escaped. 29 [11.] 10. Transfer order and order of conditions. The commissioner may 30 apply for a transfer order, pursuant to this subdivision, when a defend- 31 ant is in [his] the commissioner's custody pursuant to a retention order 32 or a recommitment order, and the commissioner is of the view that the 33 defendant does not have a dangerous mental disorder or that, consistent 34 with the public safety and welfare of the community and the defendant, 35 the clinical condition of the defendant warrants [his] the defendant's 36 transfer from a secure facility to a non-secure facility under the 37 jurisdiction of the commissioner or to any non-secure facility desig- 38 nated by the commissioner. The application for a transfer order may be 39 made to the court that issued the order under which the defendant is 40 then in custody, or to a superior court in the county where the secure 41 facility is located. The commissioner must give ten days written notice 42 to the district attorney, the defendant, counsel for the defendant, and 43 the mental hygiene legal service. Upon receipt of such application, the 44 court may, on its own motion, conduct a hearing to determine whether the 45 application should be granted, and must conduct such hearing if the 46 demand therefor is made by the district attorney. At such hearing, the 47 district attorney must establish to the satisfaction of the court that 48 the defendant has a dangerous mental disorder or that the issuance of a 49 transfer order is inconsistent with the public safety and welfare of the 50 community. The court must grant the application and issue a transfer 51 order if the court finds that the defendant does not have a dangerous 52 mental disorder, or if the court finds that the issuance of a transfer 53 order is consistent with the public safety and welfare of the community 54 and the defendant and that the clinical condition of the defendant, 55 warrants [his] the defendant's transfer from a secure facility to a 56 non-secure facility. A court must also issue a transfer order when, in S. 3378 8 1 connection with an application for a first retention order pursuant to 2 subdivision [eight] seven of this section or a second or subsequent 3 retention order pursuant to subdivision [nine] eight of this section, it 4 finds that a defendant is mentally ill but does not have a dangerous 5 mental disorder. Whenever a court issues a transfer order it must also 6 issue an order of conditions. 7 [12.] 11. Release order and order of conditions. The commissioner may 8 apply for a release order, pursuant to this subdivision, when a defend- 9 ant is in [his] the commissioner's custody pursuant to a retention order 10 or recommitment order, and the commissioner is of the view that the 11 defendant no longer has a dangerous mental disorder and is no longer 12 mentally ill. The application for a release order may be made to the 13 court that issued the order under which the defendant is then in custo- 14 dy, or to a superior court in the county where the facility is located. 15 The application must contain a description of the defendant's current 16 mental condition, the past course of treatment, a history of the defend- 17 ant's conduct subsequent to [his] the defendant's commitment, a written 18 service plan for continued treatment which shall include the information 19 specified in subdivision (g) of section 29.15 of the mental hygiene law, 20 and a detailed statement of the extent to which supervision of the 21 defendant after release is proposed. The commissioner must give ten days 22 written notice to the district attorney, the defendant, counsel for the 23 defendant, and the mental hygiene legal service. Upon receipt of such 24 application, the court must promptly conduct a hearing to determine the 25 defendant's present mental condition. At such hearing, the district 26 attorney must establish to the satisfaction of the court that the 27 defendant has a dangerous mental disorder or is mentally ill. If the 28 court finds that the defendant has a dangerous mental disorder, it must 29 deny the application for a release order. If the court finds that the 30 defendant does not have a dangerous mental disorder but is mentally ill, 31 it must issue a transfer order pursuant to subdivision [eleven] ten of 32 this section if the defendant is then confined in a secure facility. If 33 the court finds that the defendant does not have a dangerous mental 34 disorder and is not mentally ill, it must grant the application and 35 issue a release order. A court must also issue a release order when, in 36 connection with an application for a first retention order pursuant to 37 subdivision [eight] seven of this section or a second or subsequent 38 retention order pursuant to subdivision [nine] eight of this section, it 39 finds that the defendant does not have a dangerous mental disorder and 40 is not mentally ill. Whenever a court issues a release order it must 41 also issue an order of conditions. If the court has previously issued a 42 transfer order and an order of conditions, it must issue a new order of 43 conditions upon issuing a release order. The order of conditions issued 44 in conjunction with a release order shall incorporate a written service 45 plan prepared by a psychiatrist familiar with the defendant's case 46 history and approved by the court, and shall contain any conditions that 47 the court determines to be reasonably necessary or appropriate. It shall 48 be the responsibility of the commissioner to determine that such defend- 49 ant is receiving the services specified in the written service plan and 50 is complying with any conditions specified in such plan and the order of 51 conditions. 52 [13.] 12. Discharge order. The commissioner may apply for a discharge 53 order, pursuant to this subdivision, when a defendant has been contin- 54 uously on an out-patient status for three years or more pursuant to a 55 release order, and the commissioner is of the view that the defendant no 56 longer has a dangerous mental disorder and is no longer mentally ill and S. 3378 9 1 that the issuance of a discharge order is consistent with the public 2 safety and welfare of the community and the defendant. The application 3 for a discharge order may be made to the court that issued the release 4 order, or to a superior court in the county where the defendant is then 5 residing. The commissioner must give ten days written notice to the 6 district attorney, the defendant, counsel for the defendant, and the 7 mental hygiene legal service. Upon receipt of such application, the 8 court may, on its own motion, conduct a hearing to determine whether the 9 application should be granted, and must conduct such hearing if a demand 10 therefor is made by the district attorney. The court must grant the 11 application and issue a discharge order if the court finds that the 12 defendant has been continuously on an out-patient status for three years 13 or more, that [he] the defendant does not have a dangerous mental disor- 14 der and is not mentally ill, and that the issuance of the discharge 15 order is consistent with the public safety and welfare of the community 16 and the defendant. 17 [14.] 13. Recommitment order. At any time during the period covered by 18 an order of conditions an application may be made by the commissioner or 19 the district attorney to the court that issued such order, or to a supe- 20 rior court in the county where the defendant is then residing, for a 21 recommitment order when the applicant is of the view that the defendant 22 has a dangerous mental disorder. The applicant must give written notice 23 of the application to the defendant, counsel for the defendant, and the 24 mental hygiene legal service, and if the applicant is the commissioner 25 [he] the applicant must give such notice to the district attorney or if 26 the applicant is the district attorney [he] the applicant must give such 27 notice to the commissioner. Upon receipt of such application the court 28 must order the defendant to appear before it for a hearing to determine 29 if the defendant has a dangerous mental disorder. Such order may be in 30 the form of a written notice, specifying the time and place of appear- 31 ance, served personally upon the defendant, or mailed to [his] the 32 defendant's last known address, as the court may direct. If the defend- 33 ant fails to appear in court as directed, the court [may] shall issue a 34 warrant to an appropriate peace officer directing [him] such peace offi- 35 cer to take the defendant into custody and bring [him] the defendant 36 before the court. In such circumstance, the court [may] shall direct 37 that the defendant be confined in an appropriate institution located 38 near the place where the court sits. The court must conduct a hearing to 39 determine whether the defendant has a dangerous mental disorder. At such 40 hearing, the applicant, whether [he] the applicant be the commissioner 41 or the district attorney must establish to the satisfaction of the court 42 that the defendant has a dangerous mental disorder. If the applicant is 43 the commissioner, the district attorney shall be entitled to appear and 44 present evidence at such hearing; if the applicant is the district 45 attorney, the commissioner shall be entitled to appear and present 46 evidence at such hearing. If the court finds that the defendant has a 47 dangerous mental disorder, it must issue a recommitment order. When a 48 defendant is in the custody of the commissioner pursuant to a recommit- 49 ment order, the procedures set forth in subdivisions seven and eight 50 [and nine] of this section for the issuance of retention orders shall 51 govern the application for and the issuance of a first retention order, 52 a second retention order, and subsequent retention orders. 53 [15.] 14. Designation of psychiatric examiners. If, at any hearing 54 conducted under this section to determine the defendant's present mental 55 condition, the court is not satisfied with the findings of the psychiat- 56 ric examiners, the court may direct the commissioner to designate one or S. 3378 10 1 more additional psychiatric examiners to conduct an examination of the 2 defendant and submit a report of their findings. In addition, the court 3 may on its own motion, or upon request of a party, may designate one or 4 more psychiatric examiners to examine the defendant and submit a report 5 of their findings. The district attorney may apply to the court for an 6 order directing that the defendant submit to an examination by a psychi- 7 atric examiner designated by the district attorney, and such psychiatric 8 examiner may testify at the hearing. 9 [16.] 15. Rehearing and review. Any defendant who is in the custody of 10 the commissioner pursuant to [a commitment order,] a retention order, or 11 a recommitment order, if dissatisfied with such order, may, within thir- 12 ty days after the making of such order, obtain a rehearing and review of 13 the proceedings and of such order in accordance with the provisions of 14 section 9.35 or 15.35 of the mental hygiene law. 15 [17.] 16. Rights of defendants. Subject to the limitations and 16 provisions of this section, a defendant committed to the custody of the 17 commissioner pursuant to this section shall have the rights granted to 18 patients under the mental hygiene law. 19 [18.] 17. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person 20 confined by reason of a [commitment order,] recommitment order or 21 retention order to a secure facility may be discharged or released 22 unless the commissioner shall deliver written notice, at least four days 23 excluding Saturdays, Sundays and holidays, in advance of such discharge 24 or release to all of the following: 25 (a) the district attorney. 26 (b) the police department having jurisdiction of the area to which the 27 defendant is to be discharged or released. 28 (c) any other person the court may designate. 29 The notices required by this subdivision shall be given by the facili- 30 ty staff physician who was treating the defendant or, if unavailable, by 31 the defendant's treatment team leader, but if neither is immediately 32 available, notice must be given by some other member of the clinical 33 staff of the facility. Such notice must be given by any means reasonably 34 calculated to give prompt actual notice. 35 [19.] 18. Escape from custody; notice requirements. If a defendant is 36 in the custody of the commissioner pursuant to an order issued under 37 this section, and such defendant escapes from custody, immediate notice 38 of such escape shall be given by the department facility staff to: (a) 39 the district attorney, (b) the superintendent of state police, (c) the 40 sheriff of the county where the escape occurred, (d) the police depart- 41 ment having jurisdiction of the area where the escape occurred, (e) any 42 person the facility staff believes to be in danger, and (f) any law 43 enforcement agency and any person the facility staff believes would be 44 able to apprise such endangered person that the defendant has escaped 45 from the facility. Such notice shall be given as soon as the facility 46 staff know that the defendant has escaped from the facility and shall 47 include such information as will adequately identify the defendant and 48 the person or persons believed to be in danger and the nature of the 49 danger. The notices required by this subdivision shall be given by the 50 facility staff physician who was treating the defendant or, if unavail- 51 able, by the defendant's treatment team leader, but if neither is imme- 52 diately available, notice must be given by some other member of the 53 clinical staff of the facility. Such notice must be given by any means 54 reasonably calculated to give prompt actual notice. The defendant may be 55 apprehended, restrained, transported to, and returned to the facility 56 from which [he] the defendant escaped by any peace officer, and it shall S. 3378 11 1 be the duty of the officer to assist any representative of the commis- 2 sioner to take the defendant into custody upon the request of such 3 representative. 4 [20.] 19. Required affidavit. No application may be made by the 5 commissioner under this section without an accompanying affidavit from 6 at least one psychiatric examiner supportive of relief requested in the 7 application, which affidavit shall be served on all parties entitled to 8 receive the notice of application. Such affidavit shall set forth the 9 defendant's clinical diagnosis, a detailed analysis of [his or her] the 10 defendant's mental condition which caused the psychiatric examiner to 11 formulate an opinion, and the opinion of the psychiatric examiner with 12 respect to the defendant. Any application submitted without the required 13 affidavit shall be dismissed by the court. 14 [21.] 20. Appeals. (a) A party to proceedings conducted in accordance 15 with the provisions of this section may take an appeal to an intermedi- 16 ate appellate court by permission of the intermediate appellate court as 17 follows: 18 (i) the commissioner may appeal from any release order, retention 19 order, transfer order, discharge order, order of conditions, or recom- 20 mitment order, for which [he] the commissioner has not applied; 21 (ii) a defendant, or the mental hygiene legal service on [his or her] 22 the defendant's behalf, may appeal from any [commitment order,] 23 retention order, recommitment order, or, if the defendant has obtained a 24 rehearing and review of any such order pursuant to subdivision [sixteen] 25 fifteen of this section, from an order, not otherwise appealable as of 26 right, issued in accordance with the provisions of section 9.35 or 15.35 27 of the mental hygiene law authorizing continued retention under the 28 original order, provided, however, that a defendant who takes an appeal 29 from a [commitment order,] retention order, or recommitment order may 30 not subsequently obtain a rehearing and review of such order pursuant to 31 subdivision [sixteen] fifteen of this section; 32 (iii) the district attorney may appeal from any release order, trans- 33 fer order, discharge order, order of conditions, furlough order, or 34 order denying an application for a recommitment order which [he] the 35 district attorney opposed. 36 (b) An aggrieved party may appeal from a final order of the intermedi- 37 ate appellate court to the court of appeals by permission of the inter- 38 mediate appellate court granted before application to the court of 39 appeals, or by permission of the court of appeals upon refusal by the 40 intermediate appellate court or upon direct application. 41 (c) An appeal taken under this subdivision shall be deemed civil in 42 nature, and shall be governed by the laws and rules applicable to civil 43 appeals; provided, however, that a stay of the order appealed from must 44 be obtained in accordance with the provisions of paragraph (d) [hereof] 45 of this subdivision. 46 (d) The court from or to which an appeal is taken may stay all 47 proceedings to enforce the order appealed from pending an appeal or 48 determination on a motion for permission to appeal, or may grant a 49 limited stay, except that only the court to which an appeal is taken may 50 vacate, limit, or modify a stay previously granted. If the order 51 appealed from is affirmed or modified, the stay shall continue for five 52 days after service upon the appellant of the order of affirmance or 53 modification with notice of its entry in the court to which the appeal 54 was taken. If a motion is made for permission to appeal from such an 55 order, before the expiration of the five days, the stay, or any other S. 3378 12 1 stay granted pending determination of the motion for permission to 2 appeal, shall: 3 (i) if the motion is granted, continue until five days after the 4 appeal is determined; or 5 (ii) if the motion is denied, continue until five days after the 6 movant is served with the order of denial with notice of its entry. 7 [22.] 21. Any special order of conditions issued pursuant to subpara- 8 graph (i) or (ii) of paragraph (o) of subdivision one of this section 9 shall bear in a conspicuous manner the term "special order of condi- 10 tions" and a copy shall be filed by the clerk of the court with the 11 sheriff's office in the county in which anyone intended to be protected 12 by such special order resides, or, if anyone intended to be protected by 13 such special order resides within a city, with the police department of 14 such city. The absence of language specifying that the order is a 15 "special order of conditions" shall not affect the validity of such 16 order. A copy of such special order of conditions may from time to time 17 be filed by the clerk of the court with any other police department or 18 sheriff's office having jurisdiction of the residence, work place, or 19 school of anyone intended to be protected by such special order. A copy 20 of such special order may also be filed by anyone intended to be 21 protected by such provisions at the appropriate police department or 22 sheriff's office having jurisdiction. Any subsequent amendment or revo- 23 cation of such special order may be filed in the same manner as provided 24 in this subdivision. Such special order of conditions shall plainly 25 state the date that the order expires. 26 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 27 ing the date on which it shall have become a law and shall apply to 28 criminal offenses committed on or after such date.